test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-siamu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - siämu: # 2B
    siämu+N+Sg+Nom: siämu
    siämu+N+Sg+Gen: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Acc: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Ill: siämunân
    siämu+N+Sg+Loc: siämunist
    siämu+N+Sg+Com: siämunáin
    siämu+N+Sg+Abe: siämmunttáá
    siämu+N+Ess: siämun                    #siämunin
    siämu+N+Par: siämud                    #siämunid
    siämu+N+Pl+Nom: siämuneh
    siämu+N+Pl+Gen: siämunij
    siämu+N+Pl+Acc: siämunijd
    siämu+N+Pl+Ill: siämunáid
    siämu+N+Pl+Loc: siämunijn
    siämu+N+Pl+Com: siämunijguin
    siämu+N+Pl+Abe: siämunijttáá
